Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB91.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 15.334 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall approve mandatory training subjects
to be taught to all students attending a law enforcement basic training course that
include but are not limited to:
(a) Abuse, neglect, and exploitation of the elderly and other crimes against the
elderly, including the use of multidisciplinary teams in the investigation and
prosecution of crimes against the elderly;
(b) The dynamics of domestic violence, pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined
in KRS 620.020, child physical and sexual abuse, and rape; child
development; the effects of abuse and crime on adult and child victims,
including the impact of abuse and violence on child development; legal
remedies for protection; lethality and risk issues; profiles of offenders and
offender treatment; model protocols for addressing domestic violence, rape,
pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020, and child abuse;
available community resources and victim services; and reporting
requirements. This training shall be developed in consultation with legal,
victim services, victim advocacy, and mental health professionals with
expertise in domestic violence, child abuse, and rape. Training in recognizing
pediatric abusive head trauma may be designed in collaboration with
organizations and agencies that specialize in the prevention and recognition of
pediatric abusive head trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services;
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immunodeficiency
virus syndrome;
(d) Identification and investigation of, responding to, and reporting bias-related
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 10/15/2024 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 336
crime, victimization, or intimidation that is a result of or reasonably related to
race, color, religion, sex, or national origin;
(e) The characteristics and dynamics of human trafficking, state and federal laws
relating to human trafficking, the investigation of cases involving human
trafficking, including but not limited to screening for human trafficking, and
resources for assistance to the victims of human trafficking;
(f) Beginning January 1, 2017, the council shall require that a law enforcement
basic training course include at least eight (8) hours of training relevant to
sexual assault;[ and]
(g) Education on female genital mutilation as defined in KRS 508.125, including
the risk factors associated with female genital mutilation, the criminal
penalties for committing female genital mutilation, and the psychological and
health effects on a victim of female genital mutilation; and
(h) Education on suicide prevention and intervention, including but not limited
to effectively responding to calls for service and crisis intervention and de-
escalation training.
(2) (a) The council shall develop and approve mandatory in-service training courses
to be presented to all certified peace officers. The council may promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A setting forth
the deadlines by which all certified peace officers shall attend the mandatory
in-service training courses.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2017, the council shall establish a forty (40) hour sexual
assault investigation training course. After January 1, 2019, agencies shall
maintain officers on staff who have completed the forty (40) hour sexual
assault investigation training course in accordance with the following:
1. Agencies with more than ten (10) but fewer than twenty-one (21) full-
time officers shall maintain one (1) officer who has completed the forty
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 10/15/2024 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 336
(40) hour sexual assault investigation training course;
2. Agencies with twenty-one (21) or more but fewer than fifty-one (51)
full-time officers shall maintain at least two (2) officers who have
completed the forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training
course; and
3. Agencies with fifty-one (51) or more full-time officers shall maintain at
least four (4) officers who have completed the sexual assault
investigation course.
(c) An agency shall not make an officer directly responsible for the investigation
or processing of sexual assault offenses unless that officer has completed the
forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training course.
(d) The council may, upon application by any agency, grant an exemption from
the training requirements set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection if that
agency, by limitations arising from its scope of authority, does not conduct
sexual assault investigations.
(e) Any agency failing to comply with paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection
shall, from the date the noncompliance commences, have one (1) year to
reestablish the minimum number of trained officers required.
(3) The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall provide training on the subjects of
domestic violence and abuse and may do so utilizing currently available
technology. All certified peace officers shall be required to complete this training at
least once every two (2) years.
(4) The council shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish mandatory basic training and in-service training courses.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 10/15/2024 9:24 AM Jacketed